en: Cooked Chinese cabbage, Cooked nappa cabbage
fr: Chou chinois cuit

en: Curly kale
fr: Choux kale, Chou kale, Choux frisés, Chou frisé
hr: Kovrčavi kelj
nl: Boerenkool, Boerenkolen

en: Cooked curly kale
fr: Chou frisé cuit
hr: Kuhani kovrčavi kelj
nl: Gekookte broerenkolen, Gekookte boerenkool

en: Fresh cabbages
bg: Прясно зеле
da: Friske kål
fr: Chou frais
hr: Svježi kupus
nl: Verse kolen

en: Collard greens, Collard
fr: Chou cavalier
hr: Kragna
ja: カラードグリーン

en: Cardoons, Artichoke thistles
ca: card
da: kardon
de: Kardone, Cardy
el: αγριοαγκινάρα
eo: kardono
es: Cardos
fi: kardoni
fr: Cardons, Cardes
ga: cardún
gl: cardo
gv: cardoon
hr: Kartončići
hu: kardi
io: karduno
it: cardo, cardi
ja: カルドン
ko: 카르둔
la: Cynara cardunculus
nl: Kardoen
pl: kard, karczoch hiszpański
pt: cardo, cardo-de-coalho
ro: cardon
ru: кардон
sl: kardij
sr: гардун, gardun
sv: kardon
th: อาร์ทิโชก
tr: devedikeni
yi: ארטישאק
zh: 刺苞菜蓟

en: Cooked cardoons
fr: Cardons cuits

en: Carrots
bg: Моркови
da: Gulerødder, Gulerod
de: Karotten, Möhren
es: Zanahorias
fi: porkkanat
fr: Carottes
hr: Mrkve
it: Carote
ja: ニンジン, にんじん, 人参
la: Daucus carota subsp. sativus
nl: Wortels
pl: Marchew
ru: Морковь
sv: Morötter, morot
tr: Havuç

en: Cooked carrots
da: Kokte gulerødder
fr: Carottes cuites

en: Fresh carrots
bg: Пресни моркови
da: Friske gulerødder
de: Frische Karotten
es: Zanahorias frescas
fi: Tuoreet porkkanat
fr: Carottes fraîches
hr: Svježe mrkve
it: Carote fresche
nl: Verse wortel
sv: Färska morötter

en: Dehydrated carrots
da: Dehydrerede gulerødder
fr: Carottes déshydratées

en: Cauliflowers
bg: Карфиол
da: Blomkål
de: Blumenkohl
es: Coliflores, Coliflor
fi: kukkakaalit
fr: Choux-fleurs, Chou-fleur
hr: Cvjetače
it: Cavolfiori
ja: カリフラワー
la: Brassica oleracea var. botrytis
nl: Bloemkolen
pl: Kalafior, Kalafiory

en: Fresh cauliflowers
es: Coliflor fresca
fr: Choux-fleurs frais, Chou-fleur frais
hr: Svježe cvjetače

en: Glasswort, Fresh glasswort, Fresh salicornia, salicornia
fr: Salicorne, Salicorne fraîche, Salicornia fraîche, salicornia

en: Cooked cauliflowers
fr: Choux-fleurs cuits, Chou-fleur cuit
hr: Kuhane cvjetače
pl: Kalafior gotowany, Kalafiory gotowane

en: Celery
bg: Целина
de: Sellerie
es: Apios
fi: Selleri
fr: Céleri, Céleris
hr: Celer
ja: セロリ
la: Apium graveolens
nl: Selderij
pl: Seler, Selery

fr: Céleri frais
nl: Selderij (vers)

en: Celery stalk, celery stalk
fr: Céleris branche
hr: Stabljika celera
nl: Bleekselderij
pl: Seler naciowy, Selery naciowe

en: Canned celery stalks
fr: Céleri-branche en conserve, Céleri-branche appertisé, Céleri branche appertisé
hr: Stabljike celera iz konzerve
nl: Bleekselderij in blik

en: Cooked celery stalks
fr: Céleri-branche cuit